Mississippi, session 2026, HB354.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 63-3-411, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 63-3-411. (1)  The driver of a vehicle involved in an accident resulting in injury to or death of any person or total property damage to an apparent extent of Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) or more shall immediately, by the quickest means of communication, give notice of the collision to the local police department if the collision occurs within an incorporated municipality, or if the collision occurs outside of an incorporated municipality to the nearest sheriff's office or highway patrol station. (2) The department may require any driver of a vehicle involved in an accident, of which report must be made as provided in this section, to file supplemental reports whenever the original report is insufficient in the opinion of the department. Additionally, the department may require witnesses of accidents to render reports to the department. (3) It shall be the duty of the highway patrol or the sheriff's office to investigate all accidents required to be reported by this section when the accident occurs outside the corporate limits of a municipality, and it shall be the duty of the police department of each municipality to investigate all accidents required to be reported by this section when the accidents occur within the corporate limits of the municipality. Every law enforcement officer who investigates an accident as required by this subsection, whether the investigation is made at the scene of the accident or by subsequent investigation and interviews, shall forward within six (6) days after completing the investigation a written report of the accident to the department if the accident occurred outside the corporate limits of a municipality, or to the police department of the municipality if the accident occurred within the corporate limits of such municipality.  Police departments shall forward such reports to the department within six (6) days of the date of the accident. (4) Whenever an engineer of a railroad locomotive, or other person in charge of a train, is required to show proof of his identity under the provisions of this article, in connection with operation of such locomotive, to any law enforcement officer, such person shall not be required to display his operator's or chauffeur's license but shall display his railroad employee number. (5)  In addition to the information required on the "statewide uniform traffic accident report" forms provided by Section 63-3-415, the department shall require the parties involved in an accident and the witnesses of such accident to furnish their phone numbers in order to assist the investigation by law enforcement officers. (6) (a)  When responding and reporting to an accident that has caused the flow of traffic to be halted upon the public roadways as a result of one or more lanes of traffic being obstructed so as to prevent motorists from safely navigating around the accident, it shall be the duty of law enforcement officers with the highway patrol, sheriff's office or police department working the accident scene to provide approaching motorists with reasonable notification of the accident and subsequent delay within one thousand two hundred ninety-five (1,295) feet or one-quarter (1/4) mile of the crash site and lane obstruction. For purposes of this subsection, reasonable notification, when the speed limit upon the affected roadway is taken into consideration, may be satisfied by: (i) Stationing another law enforcement officer in his or her patrol vehicle with the oscillating blue lights activated at the beginning of the required notification distance of the accident, and who, in his or her discretion may occupy the shoulder of the roadway upon which the accident occurred to physically signal to approaching motorist the need to decrease speed and proceed with caution through the scene of the accident; (ii) Placing signage in highly visible locations along the right-of-way that indicates the accident ahead, beginning at the required notification distance of the accident and recurring every five hundred (500) feet; or (iii) Contacting the appropriate agency responsible for digital overhead signage upon public roads for the placement of a digital display, warning motorists of the accident ahead if the accident occurred within the region of the sign's operation. (b) The notification requirement of paragraph (a) of this subsection shall not be applicable when the responding law enforcement officer, in his or her professional judgement, after reasonable assessment of the accident scene, determines that it is neither possible nor practicable, under the circumstances, to provide such notification. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.